Tennessee, session 114, SB2127.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 39, Chapter 16, Part 5, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) A person commits an offense who intentionally communicates a threat to a
public official, or a member of a public official's immediate family, and:
(1) The person communicating the threat knows the person threatened is
a public official or a member of the public official's immediate family;
(2) The person communicating the threat intends the communication to
be a threat of harm to the public official, or a member of the public official's
immediate family, because of the public official's official capacity; and
(3) A reasonable person would perceive the communication to be a
threat of harm.
(b) A violation of subsection (a) is a Class E felony.
(c) As used in this section:
(1) "Communicate" means the same as defined in § 39-17-308;
(2) "Immediate family" means a public official's spouse, parent, sibling, or
child and includes stepparents, stepchildren, stepsiblings, and adoptive
relationships; and
(3) "Public official" means the same as defined in § 39-16-516.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2127
008763
- 1 -